Maryland, session 2026, SB0124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 2G. GENE STRUCTURE– AND FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCTS.
21–2G–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “GENE STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT” MEANS A
PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN PRODUCED USING MODERN BIOTECHNOLOGY METHODS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0124*

SENATE BILL 124
DESIGNED TO ALTER THE STRUCTURE OR FUNCTION OF ONE OR MORE GENES IN THE
PRODUCT AND WHICH LEADS TO THE PRODUCT CONTAINING ARTIFICIALLY
ENGINEERED ELEMENTS THAT MAY MODIFY THE STRUCTURE OR FUNCTION OF ONE
OR MORE GENES IN A CONSUMER.
(C) (1) “MODERN BIOTECHNOLOGY METHODS” MEANS A RECENTLY
DISCOVERED METHOD OF APPLICATION OF BIOLOGICAL PROCESSES FOR
INDUSTRIAL AND OTHER PURPOSES.
(2) “MODERN BIOTECHNOLOGY METHODS” INCLUDES:
(I) GENE EDITING;
(II) RNA INTERFERENCE; AND
(III) TRANSGENESIS.
21–2G–02.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT OFFER FOR SALE IN THE STATE A GENE
STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT UNLESS THE GENE
STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT IS LABELED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) A GENE STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT OFFERED
FOR SALE IN THE STATE SHALL BE LABELED, IN A PROMINENT AND CONSPICUOUS
MANNER, WITH:
(1) THE WORDS “GENE STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING
PRODUCT”; AND
(2) ALL POTENTIAL RISKS, SIDE EFFECTS, ADVERSE EFFECTS, AND
OTHER REASONABLY POSSIBLE EFFECTS THAT THE GENE STRUCTURE– OR
FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT MAY HAVE ON AN INDIVIDUAL WHO USES THE
GENE STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT, OR ON AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO MAY COME INTO CONTACT WITH THE INDIVIDUAL WHO USES THE
GENE STRUCTURE– OR FUNCTION–MODIFYING PRODUCT.
21–2G–03.
(A) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE:

SENATE BILL 124 3
(1) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $25,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS;
(2) IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 IN AN
ACTION IN A DISTRICT COURT; AND
(3) MAY BE ENJOINED FROM CONTINUING THE VIOLATION.
(B) EACH DAY ON WHICH A VIOLATION OCCURS AFTER CONVICTION FOR A
FIRST OFFENSE IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION.
21–2G–04.
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE CONSTRUED LIBERALLY TO CARRY OUT ITS
PURPOSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.